New Jersey, session 221, A1925.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1[1.  Section 27 of P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-27) is amended to read as follows: 27.  All examinations conducted by the board pursuant to this act, including any examination required of a practicing licensee, shall consist of practical and written portions and [may] shall be administered in English, [and in the case of practicing licensees, in Spanish or with the aid of a translator, if the board, in its discretion, deems that aid to be warranted] with the option to provide the examinations in the four other languages most commonly spoken in the State. The Division of Consumers Affairs shall post on its Internet website the four other languages in which the practical and written examination are to be offered. The Director of the division shall, at least every five years, verify the four languages, other than English, most commonly spoken in the State. (cf: P.L.1991, c.313, s.3)]1 11.   Section 27 of P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-27) is amended to read as follows: 27. All examinations conducted by the board pursuant to [this act] P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-1 et seq.), including any examination required of a practicing licensee, shall consist of practical and written portions and [may] shall be administered in English, with the option to take each portion of the examination in one of the four other languages most commonly spoken in the State2, unless the languages are determined by the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety to not be in compliance with P.L.2023, c.263 (C.52:14-40 et seq.), in which case the division shall consult with the board concerning the languages in which the examinations shall be provided2, and in the case of practicing licensees, [in Spanish or] with the aid of a translator, if the board, in its discretion 2and in accordance with P.L.2023, c.263 (C.52:14-40 et seq.)2, deems that aid to be warranted.  2[The] If the board is deemed in compliance with New Jersey law, the2 Division of Consumers Affairs shall consult the American Community Survey issued by the United States Census Bureau, or a comparable data set, to determine the four other languages most commonly spoken in the State and post on its Internet website these languages in which the practical and written examination are to be offered.  The division shall, at least every five years, verify the four languages, other than English, most commonly spoken in the State.1 (cf: P.L.1991, c.313, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the 1[tenth] 12th1 month next after enactment.